ro-RO: Tipul de mâner al lopeții: Mâner tip D; Mâner ergonomic; Mâner drept; Mâner în T; Altele
ko: 삽 손잡이 그립 유형: D-핸들; 인체공학적 그립; 일자형 그립; T-핸들; 기타
pt-PT: Tipo de punho do cabo da pá: Punho em D; Cabo ergonómico; Cabo reto; Punho em T; Outro
th: รูปแบบด้ามจับพลั่ว: ด้ามจับรูปทรงตัว D; ด้ามจับตามหลักสรีรศาสตร์; การจับแบบตรง; แฮนเดิลตัวที; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος λαβής λαβής φτυαριού.: D-handle (προσδιοριστικό οντότητας); Εργονομική λαβή; Ευθεία λαβή; Λαβή Τ; Άλλο
ja: ショベルハンドルグリップの種類: D型ハンドル; 人間工学に基づくグリップ; ストレートグリップ; Tハンドル; その他
nb: Spadehåndtakets grepstype: D-referanse; Ergonomisk grep; Rett grep; T-håndtak; Annet
zh-TW: 鏟柄握把類型: D 形把手; 人體工學握把; 直式握把; T 型把手; 其他
fr: Type de poignée du manche de la pelle: Poignée en D; Poignée ergonomique; Poignée droite; Poignée en T; Autre
es: Tipo de empuñadura del mango de la pala: Con asas; Agarre ergonómico; Agarre recto; Asa en T; Otros
zh-CN: 铲子手柄握把的类型: D 型手柄; 符合人体工学的握把; 直握; T 型把手; 其他
da: Skovlhåndtags grebstype: D-håndtag; Ergonomisk greb; Lige greb; T-håndtag; Andet
cs: Typ rukojeti na násadě na lopatu: D-rukojeť; Ergonomická rukojeť; Rovná násada; T-rukojeť; Jiné
nl: Steelgreep: D-greep; Ergonomische handgreep; Rechte greep; T-handgreep; Overig
sk-SK: Typ rukoväte lopaty: Rukoväť v tvare D; Ergonomický úchop; Rovný úchop; T-rukoväť; Iné
sv: Typ av grepp på spadens handtag: D-handtag; Ergonomiskt grepp; Rakt grepp; T-handtag; Annat
it: Tipo di impugnatura della pala: Impugnatura a D; Impugnatura ergonomica; Impugnatura dritta; Impugnatura a T; Altro
ru: Тип рукоятки лопаты: D-образная ручка; Эргономичная рукоятка; Прямая рукоятка; T-образная рукоятка; Другая
de: Typ des Schaufelstielgriffs: D-Griff; Ergonomischer Griff; Gerader Griff; T-Griff; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Vrsta hvata ručke lopate: D-ručka; Ergonomski hvat; Ravni hvat; T-ručka; Ostalo
fi: Lapion kahvan otteen tyyppi: D-kahva; Ergonominen ote; Suora ote; T-kahva; Muu
en: Shovel handle grip type: D-handle; Ergonomic grip; Straight grip; T-handle; Other
sl-SI: Vrsta ročaja lopate: D-ročaj; Ergonomski oprijem; Ravni prijem; T-ročaj; Drug
vi: Loại tay nắm của cán xẻng: Tay cầm chữ D; Tay cầm công thái học; Tay cầm thẳng; Tay cầm chữ T; Khác
bg-BG: Дръжка за лопата тип ръкохватка: D–образна дръжка; Ергономичен захват; Прав захват; Т-образна дръжка; Друго
hu: Lapát markolatának típusa: D alakú fogantyú; Ergonomikus markolat; Egyenes fogás; T-fogantyú; Egyéb
pt-BR: Tipo de empunhadura do cabo da pá: Alça em formato D; Cabo ergonômico; Empunhadura reta; Cabo em T; Outro
pl: Typ uchwytu szufli: Uchwyt typu D; Uchwyt ergonomiczny; Uchwyt prosty; Uchwyt w kształcie T; Inne
tr: Kürek sapı tutma tipi: D sap; Ergonomik sap; Düz sap; T-sap; Diğer
lt-LT: Kastuvas rankenos suėmimo tipas: D formos rankena; Ergonomiška rankena; Tiesi rankena; T formos rankena; Kita